Utah statutes.
11-25-16.   Refunding bonds -- Issuance -- Proceeds -- Investments.
(1)  The agency may provide for the issuance of the bonds of the agency to:
(a)  refund any outstanding bonds of the agency;
(b)  pay any redemption premiums and any interest accrued or to accrue to the
earliest or subsequent date of redemption, purchase, or maturity of those
bonds; and
(c)  pay all or any part of the cost of additional residential rehabilitation.
(2)  The agency may:
(a)  apply the proceeds of bonds issued for the purpose of refunding any
outstanding bonds to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption of
any outstanding bonds, either at their earliest or any subsequent redemption
date or upon the purchase or retirement at their maturity; and
(b)  pending that application, place them in escrow, to be applied to the
purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption on the date determined by the
agency.
(3) (a)  Pending use for purchase, retirement at maturity, or redemption of
outstanding bonds, any proceeds held in escrow under Subsection (2) shall be
invested by following the procedures and requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7,
State Money Management Act.
(b)  The agency shall apply any interest or other increment earned or realized
on an investment to the payment of the outstanding bonds to be refunded.
(c)  After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out,
any balance of proceeds and any interest or increment earned or realized from
the investment of them may be returned to the agency to be used by it for any
lawful purpose.
(4)  The agency shall invest that portion of the proceeds of any bonds
designated for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of additional
residential rehabilitation under Subsection (1) by following the procedures
and requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.
(5)  All bonds issued under this section  are subject to the provisions of
this part in the same manner and to the same extent as other bonds issued
under this chapter.
